Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2756YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 741 Section 1. Section 710A.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. âHuman traffickingâ also means knowingly purchasing or 3 attempting to purchase services involving commercial sexual 4 activity from a victim or another person engaged in human 5 trafficking , or from a law enforcement officer or agent posing 6 as a person engaged in human trafficking . 7 Sec. 2. Section 710A.1, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 13. âVictimâ means a person subjected to human trafficking. 10 any of the following: 11 a. A person subjected to human trafficking. 12 b. A person who is identified as being subjected to or 13 targeted for human trafficking. 14 c. A law enforcement officer or agent posing as a person 15 subjected to or a target for human trafficking. 16